Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.400

General contractor/construction manager procedure—Prebid determination of subcontractor eligibility.

(1) If determination of subcontractor eligibility prior to seeking bids is in the best interest of the project and critical to the successful completion of a subcontract bid package, the general contractor/construction manager and the public body may determine subcontractor eligibility to bid. The general contractor/construction manager and the public body must:

(a) Conduct a hearing and provide an opportunity for any interested party to submit written and verbal comments regarding the justification for conducting bidder eligibility, the evaluation criteria, and weights for each criteria and subcriteria;

(b) Publish a notice of intent to evaluate and determine bidder eligibility in a legal newspaper published in or as near as possible to that part of the county where the public work will be constructed at least 14 calendar days before conducting a public hearing. The general contractor/construction manager and public body are encouraged to post the notice in additional areas beyond the legal newspaper as required under this subsection, such as websites for business associations, the office of minority and women's business enterprises, and other locations and mediums that will further publicize the intent to use subcontractor eligibility prior to seeking bids;

(c) Ensure the public hearing notice includes the date, time, and location of the hearing, a statement justifying the basis and need for performing eligibility analysis before bid opening, and how interested parties may, at least five days before the hearing, obtain the specific eligibility criteria and applicable weights given to each criteria and subcriteria that will be used during evaluation;

(d) After the public hearing, consider written and verbal comments received and determine if establishing bidder eligibility in advance of seeking bids is in the best interests of the project and critical to the successful completion of a subcontract bid package; and

(e) Issue a written final determination to all interested parties. All protests of the decision to establish bidder eligibility before issuing a subcontractor bid package must be filed with the superior court within seven calendar days of the final determination. Any modifications to the eligibility criteria and weights shall be based on comments received during the public hearing process and shall be included in the final determination.

(2) Determinations of bidder eligibility shall be in accordance with the evaluation criteria and weights for each criteria established in the final determination and shall be provided to interested persons upon request. Any potential bidder determined not to meet eligibility criteria must be afforded one opportunity to establish its eligibility. Protests concerning bidder eligibility determinations shall be in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2021 c 230 s 14; 2013 c 222 s 17; 2007 c 494 s 307.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.